Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-104.09
Workers Memorial Day; proclamation by Governor; commemoration.

The Governor shall annually proclaim April 28 as Workers Memorial Day in remembrance of the courage and integrity of American workers. The Governor shall recommend that Workers Memorial Day be observed in an appropriate manner.

Laws 1991, LB 199, § 1.